West Virginia, session 2026, SB1057.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 2S. Green Burial and natural burial. §16-2S-1. Legislative findings and purpose. (a) The Legislature finds that:(1) Families increasingly seek burial options that minimize environmental impact, respect religious or personal beliefs, or reduce cost;(2) Natural burial and green burial practices are widely recognized and safely practiced in many states;(3) Public health can be protected through objective standards without mandating embalming or funeral-director involvement; and(4) Burial practices should not be restricted by professional licensure where no compelling public-health justification exists.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to:(1) Expressly authorize natural burial in West Virginia;(2) Preserve family choice and religious liberty;(3) Ensure public-health protection through clear statutory standards; and(4) Prevent monopolization or professional capture of burial practices. §16-2S-2. Definitions. For purposes of this article:"Natural burial" or "green burial" means the disposition of human remains by burial without embalming fluids, vaults, liners, or other non-biodegradable materials, using biodegradable containers or shrouds."Burial container" means a biodegradable casket, coffin, or shroud."Cemetery" means any cemetery lawfully operating in this state, including conventional cemeteries that elect to permit natural burial."Disposition" means the burial of human remains. §16-2S-3. Authorization of natural burial. (a) Natural burial is lawful in this state.(b) A cemetery may elect to permit natural burial without additional licensure, certification, or approval beyond that required to operate as a cemetery.(c) No cemetery is required to offer natural burial. §16-2S-4. Funeral director involvement not required. (a) A licensed funeral director or embalmer is not required for:(1) Natural burial;(2) Transportation of unembalmed remains for natural burial; or(3) Burial conducted in accordance with this article.(b) Nothing in this section prohibits a family from voluntarily engaging a licensed funeral director.(c) The Board of Funeral Service Examiners shall have no regulatory authority over natural burial practices authorized by this article, except as expressly provided by statute. §16-2S-5. Public health standards. (a) Embalming is not required for natural burial.(b) Burial shall occur within a time period sufficient to protect public health, as established by statute or general public-health law.(c) The Department of Health may intervene only where:(1) There is a documented risk of communicable disease; or(2) An emergency public-health declaration is in effect.(d) No rule may impose requirements that effectively prohibit natural burial. §16-2S-6. Cemetery authority and limitations. (a) Cemeteries may adopt reasonable operational rules for natural burial, including:(1) Grave depth;(2) Recordkeeping; and(3) Location within the cemetery.(b) Cemeteries may not require embalming, vaults, or non-biodegradable containers as a condition of natural burial. §16-2S-7. Prohibition on professional or trade-association control. (a) No professional licensing board, trade association, or private accrediting body may:(1) Prohibit natural burial;(2) Require licensure as a condition of natural burial; or(3) Impose standards not expressly authorized by statute.(b) Any rule or policy inconsistent with this article is void. §16-2S-8. Prohibition on professional or trade-association control. (a) This article shall be liberally construed to effectuate family choice, religious freedom, and lawful disposition of human remains.(b) Nothing in this article limits:(1) Criminal law;(2) Vital records requirements; or(3) Generally applicable public-health authority exercised in emergencies. §16-2S-9. Effective date. This act shall take effect 90 days from passage.